California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(f) A person authorized to perform abortion by aspiration techniques described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) and paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) shall not be punished, held liable for damages in a civil action, or denied any right or privilege for any action relating to the evaluation of clinical competency of a nurse practitioner pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) or a certified nurse-midwife pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b).

(g) This section shall not be interpreted to authorize a person with a license or
 certificate to practice as a nurse practitioner or certified nurse-midwife to perform abortion by aspiration techniques after the first trimester of pregnancy.

(h) For purposes of this section, exclusively online or simulation-based training programs that do not include mandatory clinical hours involving direct patient care shall not meet the clinical training requirements in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 631, Sec. 1.   (SB 1375)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2725.5.

“Advanced practice registered nurse” means those licensed registered nurses who have met the requirements of Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 2746), Article 7 (commencing with Section 2825), Article 8 (commencing with Section 2834), or Article 9 (commencing with Section 2838).

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 640, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2726.

Except as otherwise provided herein, this chapter confers no authority to practice medicine or surgery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 355.)
-------------------------------------------

2727.

This chapter does not prohibit:

(a) Gratuitous nursing of the sick by friends or members of the family.

(b) Incidental care of the sick by domestic workers or by persons primarily employed as housekeepers as long as they do not practice nursing within the meaning of this chapter.

(c) Domestic administration of family remedies by any person.

(d) Nursing services in case of an emergency. “Emergency,” as used in this subdivision includes an epidemic, pandemic, or other public disaster.

(e) The performance by a person of the duties required in the physical care of a patient or carrying out medical orders prescribed by a licensed physician, provided the person shall not in any way assume to practice as a professional, registered, graduate, or trained nurse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 628, Sec. 5.   (AB 1532)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2727.5.

A person licensed under this chapter who in good faith renders emergency care at the scene of an emergency which occurs outside both the place and the course of that person’s employment shall not be liable for any civil damages as the result of acts or omissions by that person in rendering the emergency care.

This section shall not grant immunity from civil damages when the person is grossly negligent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1391, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2728.

If adequate medical and nursing supervision by a professional nurse or nurses is provided, nursing service may be given by attendants, psychiatric technicians, or psychiatric technician interim permittees in institutions under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals or the State Department of Developmental Services or subject to visitation by the State Department of Public Health or the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. Services given by a psychiatric technician shall be limited to services that they are authorized to perform by their license as a psychiatric technician. Services given by a psychiatric technician interim permittee shall be limited to skills included in their basic course of study and performed under the supervision of a licensed psychiatric technician or registered nurse.

The Director of State Hospitals, the Director of Developmental Services, and the State Public Health Officer shall determine what shall constitute adequate medical and nursing supervision in any institution under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals or the State Department of Developmental Services or subject to visitation by the State Department of Public Health.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, institutions under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals or the State Department of Developmental Services may utilize graduates of accredited psychiatric technician training programs who are not licensed psychiatric technicians or psychiatric technician interim permittees to perform skills included in their basic course of study when supervised by a licensed psychiatric technician or registered nurse, for a period not to exceed nine months.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 25.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2728.5.

Except for those provisions of law relating to directors of nursing services, nothing in this chapter or any other provision of law shall prevent the utilization of a licensed psychiatric technician or psychiatric technician interim permittee in performing services used in the care, treatment, and rehabilitation of mentally ill, emotionally disturbed, or developmentally disabled persons within the scope of practice for which he
 or she is licensed or authorized in facilities under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals or the State Department of Developmental Services or licensed by the State Department of Public Health, that he or she is licensed to perform as a psychiatric technician, or authorized to perform as a psychiatric technician interim permittee including any nursing services under Section 2728, in facilities under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals or the State Department of Developmental Services or subject to visitation by the State Department of Public Health.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 2.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2729.

Nursing services may be rendered by a student when these services are incidental to the course of study of one of the following:

(a) A student enrolled in a board-approved prelicensure program or school of nursing.

(b) A nurse licensed in another state or country taking a board-approved continuing education course or a postlicensure course.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 212.)
-------------------------------------------

2730.

If he does not represent or hold himself out as a professional nurse licensed to practice in this State and if he has an engagement, made in another State or country, requiring him to accompany and care for a patient temporarily residing in this State during the period of such engagement, a nurse legally qualified by another State or country may give nursing care to such patient in this State.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 807.)
-------------------------------------------

2731.

This chapter does not prohibit nursing or the care of the sick, with or without compensation or personal profit, when done by the adherents of and in connection with the practice of the religious tenets of any well recognized church or denomination, so long as they do not otherwise engage in the practice of nursing.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 807.)
-------------------------------------------

2732.

No person shall engage in the practice of nursing, as defined in Section 2725, without holding a license that is in an active status issued under this chapter except as otherwise provided in this act.

Every licensee may be known as a registered nurse and may place the letters “R.N.” after their name.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 26.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2732.05.

(a) Every employer of a registered nurse, every employer of a registered nurse required to hold any board-issued certification, and every person acting as an agent for such a nurse in obtaining employment, shall ascertain that the nurse is currently authorized to practice as a registered nurse or as a registered nurse pursuant to a board-issued certification within the provisions of this chapter. As used in this section, “board-issued certification” includes, but is not limited to, certification as a nurse practitioner, nurse practitioner
 with a furnishing number, nurse anesthetist, nurse midwife, nurse midwife with a furnishing number, public health nurse, clinical nurse specialist, or board listed psychiatric mental health nurse.

(b) Every employer of a temporary licensee or interim permittee and every person acting as an agent for a temporary licensee or interim permittee in obtaining employment shall ascertain that the person is currently authorized to practice as a temporary licensee or interim permittee.

(c) As used in this section, the term “agent” includes, but is not limited to, a nurses registry and a traveling nurse agency.

Examination by an employer or agent of evidence satisfactory to the board showing the nurse’s, licensee’s, or permittee’s current authority to practice under this chapter, prior to employment, shall constitute a determination of authority to
 so practice.

Nothing in this section shall apply to a patient, or other person acting for a specific patient, who engages the services of a registered nurse or temporary licensee to provide nursing care to a single patient.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 588, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2732.1.

(a) An applicant for license by examination shall submit a written application in the form prescribed by the board.

Upon approval of the application, the board may issue an interim permit authorizing the applicant to practice nursing pending the results of the first licensing examination following completion of their nursing course or for a maximum period of six months, whichever occurs first.

If the applicant passes the examination, the interim permit shall remain in effect until a regular renewable license is issued by the board. If the applicant fails the examination, the interim permit shall terminate.

(b) The board upon written
 application may issue a license without examination to any applicant who is licensed or registered as a nurse in a state, district, or territory of the United States or Canada having, in the opinion of the board, requirements for licensing or registration equal to or higher than those in California at the time the application is filed with the Board of Registered Nursing, if they have passed an examination for the license or registration that is, in the board’s opinion, comparable to the board’s examination, and if they meet all the other requirements set forth in Section 2736.

(c) Each application shall be accompanied by the fee prescribed by this chapter for the filing of an application for a regular renewable license.

The interim permit shall terminate if it is issued by mistake or if the application for permanent licensure is denied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 27.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2733.

(a) (1) (A) Upon approval of an application filed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2732.1, and upon the payment of the fee prescribed by subdivision (k) of Section 2815, the board may issue a temporary license to practice professional nursing, and a temporary certificate to practice as a certified public health nurse for a period of six months from the date of issuance.

(B) Upon approval of an application filed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2732.1, and upon the payment of the fee prescribed by subdivision (d) of Section 2838.2, the board may issue a temporary certificate to practice as a certified clinical nurse specialist for a period of six months from the date of issuance.

(C) Upon approval of an application filed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2732.1, and upon the payment of the fee prescribed by subdivision (e) of Section 2815.5, the board may issue a temporary certificate to practice as a certified nurse-midwife for a period of six months from the date of issuance.

(D) Upon approval of an application filed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2732.1, and upon the payment of the fee prescribed by subdivision (d) of Section 2830.7, the board may issue a temporary certificate to practice as a certified nurse anesthetist for a period of six months from the date of issuance.

(E) Upon approval of an application filed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2732.1, and upon the payment of the fee prescribed by subdivision (p) of Section 2815, the board may issue a temporary
 certificate to practice as a certified nurse practitioner for a period of six months from the date of issuance.

(2) A temporary license or temporary certificate shall terminate if it is issued by mistake or if the application for permanent licensure is denied.

(b) Upon written application, the board may reissue a temporary license or temporary certificate to any person who has applied for a regular renewable license pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2732.1 and who, in the judgment of the board has been excusably delayed in completing their application for or the minimum requirements for a regular renewable license, but the board may not reissue a temporary license or temporary certificate more than twice to any one person.

(c) The board shall prominently display on the front page of its website the availability
 of temporary licenses and certificates pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 28.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2734.

Upon application in writing to the board and payment of the biennial renewal fee, a licensee may have their license placed in an inactive status for an indefinite period of time. A licensee whose license is in an inactive status may not practice nursing. However, a licensee does not have to comply with the continuing education standards of Section 2811.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 29.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2736.

(a) An applicant for licensure as a registered nurse shall comply with each of the following:

(1) Have completed general preliminary education requirements as shall be determined by the board.

(2) Have successfully completed the courses of instruction prescribed by the board for licensure, in a program in this state approved by the board for training registered nurses, or have successfully completed courses of instruction in a school of nursing outside of this state that, in the opinion of the board at the time the application is filed with the board, are equivalent to the minimum requirements of the board for licensure
 established for an approved program in this state.

(3) Not be subject to denial of licensure under Section 480.

(4) (A) The board shall require an applicant for licensure as a registered nurse to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check.

(B) The board shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for individuals specified in subparagraph (A) who are subject to a state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105.

(b) An applicant who has received their training from a school of nursing in a country outside the United States and who has complied with subdivision (a), or has completed training equivalent to that required by subdivision (a), shall qualify for licensure by successfully passing the examination prescribed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 313, Sec. 1.   (AB 2796)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2736.1.

(a) The course of instruction for an applicant who matriculates on or after September 1, 1985, shall include training in the detection and treatment of alcohol and chemical substance dependency.

(b) The course of instruction for an applicant who matriculates on or after January 1, 1995, shall include training in the detection and treatment of client abuse, including, but not limited to, spousal or partner abuse. The requirement for coursework in spousal or partner abuse
 detection and treatment shall be satisfied by, and the board shall accept in satisfaction of the requirement, a certification from the chief academic officer of the educational institution from which the applicant graduated that the required coursework is included within the institution’s required curriculum for graduation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1234, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2736.5.

(a) (1) The board shall adopt regulations to require that, on and after January 1, 2022, all continuing education courses for licensees under this chapter contain curriculum that includes the understanding of implicit bias.

(2) Beginning January 1, 2023, continuing education providers shall ensure compliance with paragraph (1). Beginning January 1, 2023, the board shall audit continuing education providers, pursuant to Section 2811.5.

(b) Notwithstanding the
 provisions of subdivision (a), a continuing education course dedicated solely to research or other issues that does not include a direct patient care component is not required to contain curriculum that includes implicit bias in the practice of nursing.

(c) In order to satisfy the requirements of subdivision (a), continuing education courses shall address at least one or a combination of the following:

(1) Examples of how implicit bias affects perceptions and treatment decisions of licensees, leading to disparities in health outcomes.

(2) Strategies to address how unintended biases in decisionmaking may contribute to health care disparities by shaping behavior and producing differences in medical treatment along lines of race, ethnicity, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, socioeconomic status, or other
 characteristics.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 417, Sec. 3.   (AB 241)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2736.6.

The board shall determine by regulation the additional preparation in nursing, in a school approved by the board, which is required for a vocational nurse, licensed under Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 2840) of this division, to be eligible to take the examination for licensure under this chapter as a registered nurse. The board shall not require more than 30 units in nursing and related science subjects to satisfy such preparation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1541.)
-------------------------------------------

2737.

An applicant for a license authorizing him to practice nursing in this State under this chapter, upon the filing of his application shall pay the fee required by this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 807.)
-------------------------------------------

2740.

Examinations shall be written, but in the discretion of the board may be supplemented by an oral or practical examination in such subjects as the board determines. All examinations shall be conducted by such persons and in such manner and under such rules and regulations as the board may prescribe.

The board shall finally pass or reject all applicants. Its actions shall be final and conclusive and not subject to review by any court or other authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 807.)
-------------------------------------------

2741.

An application for reexamination shall be accompanied by the fees prescribed by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 621, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2742.

The board shall issue a license to each applicant who passes the examination and meets all other licensing requirements. The form of the license shall be determined in accordance with Section 164.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 850, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Nurse-Midwives [2746. - 2746.8.]

2746.

The board shall issue a certificate to practice nurse-midwifery to any person who qualifies under this article and is licensed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1407.)
-------------------------------------------

2746.1.

Every applicant for a certificate to practice nurse-midwifery shall comply with all the provisions of this article in addition to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1407.)
-------------------------------------------

2746.2.

(a) An applicant shall show by evidence satisfactory to the board that they have met the educational standards established by the board or have at least the equivalent thereof.

(b) (1) The board shall appoint a committee of qualified physicians and surgeons and nurses called the Nurse-Midwifery Advisory Committee.

(2) The committee shall make recommendations to the board on all matters related to midwifery practice, education, appropriate standard of care, and other matters as specified by the board. The committee shall provide recommendations or guidance on care when the board is considering disciplinary
 action against a certified nurse-midwife.

(3) The committee shall consist of four qualified nurse-midwives, two qualified physicians and surgeons, including, but not limited to, obstetricians or family physicians, and one public member.

(4) If the board is unable, despite good faith efforts, to solicit and appoint committee members pursuant to the specifications in
 paragraph (3), the committee may continue to make recommendations pursuant to paragraph (2).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 88, Sec. 3.   (SB 1237)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2746.3.

Midwife’s certificates issued by the Medical Board of California prior to the effective date of this article shall be renewable only by such board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 886, Sec. 53.)
-------------------------------------------

2746.4.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to prevent the practice of midwifery by a person possessing a midwife’s certificate issued by the Medical Board of California on the effective date of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 886, Sec. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

2746.5.

(a) The certificate to practice nurse-midwifery authorizes the holder to attend cases of low-risk pregnancy and childbirth and to provide prenatal care, intrapartum care, and postpartum care, including immediate care for the newborn, interconception care, family planning care, and care for
 common gynecologic conditions, consistent with the Core Competencies for Basic Midwifery Practice adopted by the American College of Nurse-Midwives, or its successor national professional organization, as approved by the board. For purposes of this subdivision, “low-risk pregnancy” means a pregnancy in which all of the following conditions are met:

(1) There is a single fetus.

(2) There is a cephalic presentation at onset of labor.

(3) The gestational age of the fetus is greater than or equal to 37 weeks and zero days and less than or equal to 42 weeks and zero days at the time of delivery.

(4) Labor is spontaneous or induced.

(5) The patient has
 no preexisting disease or condition, whether arising out of the pregnancy or otherwise, that adversely affects the pregnancy and that the certified nurse-midwife is not qualified to independently address consistent with this section.

(b) (1) The certificate to practice nurse-midwifery authorizes the holder, pursuant to policies and protocols that are mutually agreed upon by a physician and surgeon, that delineate the parameters for consultation, collaboration, referral, and transfer of a patient’s care, and that are signed by both the certified nurse-midwife and a physician and surgeon, to do any of the
 following:

(A) Provide a patient with care that falls outside the scope of services specified in subdivision (a).

(B) Provide intrapartum care to a patient who has had a prior cesarean section or surgery that interrupts the myometrium.

(C) Furnish or order a Schedule II or III controlled substance, including for patients that fall within the scope of services specified in subdivision (a). 

(2) If a physician and surgeon assumes care of the patient, the certified nurse-midwife may continue to attend the birth of the newborn and participate in physical care, counseling, guidance, teaching, and support, as indicated by the mutually agreed-upon
 policies and protocols signed by both the certified nurse-midwife and a physician and surgeon.

(3) After a certified nurse-midwife refers a patient to a physician and surgeon, the certified nurse-midwife may continue care of the patient during a reasonable interval between the referral and the initial appointment with the physician and surgeon.

(c) (1) If a nurse-midwife does not have in place mutually agreed-upon policies and protocols that delineate the parameters for consultation, collaboration, referral, and transfer of a patient’s care, signed by both the certified nurse-midwife and a physician and surgeon pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), the patient shall be transferred to the care of a physician and surgeon to do either or both of the following:

(A) Provide a patient with
 care that falls outside the scope of services specified in subdivision (a).

(B) Provide intrapartum care to a patient who has had a prior cesarean section or surgery that interrupts the myometrium.

(2) After the certified nurse-midwife initiates the process of transfer pursuant to paragraph (1), for a patient who otherwise meets the definition of a low-risk pregnancy but no longer meets the criteria specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) because the gestational age of the fetus is greater than 42 weeks and zero days, if there is inadequate time to effect safe transfer to a hospital prior to delivery or transfer may pose a threat to the health and safety of the patient or the fetus,
 the certified nurse-midwife may continue care of the patient consistent with the transfer plan described in subdivision (a) of Section 2746.54.

(3) A patient who has been transferred from the care of a certified nurse-midwife to that of a physician and surgeon may return to the care of the certified nurse-midwife after the physician and surgeon has determined that the condition or circumstance that required, or would require, the transfer from the care of the nurse-midwife pursuant to paragraph (1) is resolved.

(d) The certificate to practice nurse-midwifery authorizes the holder to attend pregnancy and childbirth in an out-of-hospital setting if consistent with subdivisions (a), (b), and (c).

(e) This section shall not be interpreted to deny a patient’s right to self-determination or informed
 decisionmaking with regard to choice of provider or birth setting.

(f) The certificate to practice nurse-midwifery does not authorize the holder of the certificate to assist childbirth by vacuum or forceps extraction, or to perform any external cephalic version.

(g) A certified nurse-midwife shall document all consultations, referrals, and transfers in the patient record.

(h) (1) A certified nurse-midwife shall refer all emergencies to a physician and surgeon immediately.

(2) A certified nurse-midwife may provide emergency care until the assistance of a physician and surgeon is obtained.

(i) This chapter does not authorize a nurse-midwife to practice medicine or
 surgery.

(j) This section shall not be construed to require a physician and surgeon to sign protocols and procedures for a nurse-midwife or to permit any action that violates Section 2052 or 2400.

(k) This section shall not be construed to require a nurse-midwife to have mutually agreed-upon, signed policies and protocols for the provision of services described in subdivision (a).

(l) Notwithstanding any other law, subject to the discretion of a general acute care hospital, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, or a special hospital specified as a maternity hospital, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, and the medical staff bylaws of that facility, a
 hospital may grant privileges to a certified nurse-midwife, allowing them to admit and discharge patients upon their own authority, within their scope of practice, as delineated in this section, and in accordance with organized medical staff bylaws of that facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 497, Sec. 2.5.   (SB 667)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2746.51.

(a) Neither this chapter nor any other law shall be construed to prohibit a certified nurse-midwife from furnishing or ordering drugs or devices, including controlled substances classified in Schedule II, III, IV, or V under the California Uniform Controlled Substances Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code), when all of the following apply:

(1) The drugs or devices are furnished or ordered incidentally to the provision of any of the following:

(A) The care and services described in Section 2746.5.

(B) Care rendered,
 consistent with the certified nurse-midwife’s educational preparation or for which clinical competency has been established and maintained, to persons within a facility specified in subdivision (a), (b), (c), (d), (i), or (j) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code, a clinic as specified in Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code, a general acute care hospital as
 defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, a licensed birth center as defined in Section 1204.3 of the Health and Safety Code, or a special hospital specified as a maternity hospital in subdivision (f) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) Care rendered in an out-of-hospital setting pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2746.5. 

(2) The furnishing or ordering of drugs or devices by a certified nurse-midwife for services that do not fall within the scope of services specified in subdivision (a) of Section 2746.5 shall be
 furnished in accordance with, and specified in, the policies and protocols mutually agreed upon pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2746.5, which shall specify all of the following:

(A) Which certified nurse-midwife may furnish or order drugs or devices.

(B) Which drugs or devices may be furnished or ordered and under what circumstances.

(C) The method of periodic review of the certified nurse-midwife’s competence, including peer review, and review of the provisions of the standardized procedure.

(3) If
 Schedule II or III controlled substances, as defined in Sections 11055 and 11056 of the Health and Safety Code, are furnished or ordered by a certified nurse-midwife for any condition, including, but not limited to, Schedule II or III controlled substances for services that fall within the scope of services specified in subdivision (a) of Section 2746.5, the controlled substances shall be furnished or ordered in accordance with policies and protocols mutually agreed upon pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2746.5. For Schedule II controlled substance protocols, the provision for furnishing the Schedule II controlled substance shall address the diagnosis of the illness, injury, or condition for which the Schedule II controlled substance is to be furnished.

(b) (1) The furnishing or ordering of drugs or
 devices by a certified nurse-midwife is conditional on the issuance by the board of a number to the applicant who has successfully completed the requirements of paragraph (2). The board may issue a furnishing number upon initial application and, if approved by the board, the applicant shall not be required to make a separate application. The number shall be included on all transmittals of orders for drugs or devices by the certified nurse-midwife. The board shall maintain a list of the certified nurse-midwives that it has certified pursuant to this paragraph and the number it has issued to each one. The board shall make the list available to the California State Board of Pharmacy upon its request. Every certified nurse-midwife who is authorized pursuant to this section to furnish or issue a drug order for a controlled substance shall register with the United States Drug Enforcement Administration
 and the Controlled Substance Utilization Review and Enforcement System (CURES) pursuant to Section 11165.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The board has certified in accordance with paragraph (1) that the certified nurse-midwife has satisfactorily completed a course in pharmacology covering the drugs or devices to be furnished or ordered under this section, including the risks of addiction and neonatal abstinence syndrome associated with the use of opioids. The board shall establish the requirements for satisfactory completion of this paragraph. 

(3) Certified nurse-midwives who are certified by the board and hold an active furnishing number and who are registered with the United States Drug Enforcement Administration shall provide documentation of continuing education specific
 to the use of Schedule II controlled substances in settings other than a hospital based on standards developed by the board.

(c) Furnishing of drugs or devices by a certified nurse-midwife means the act of making a pharmaceutical agent or agents available to the patient. Use of the term “furnishing” in this section shall include the following:

(1) The ordering of a nonscheduled drug or device for services that fall within the scope of services specified in subdivision (a) of Section 2746.5.

(2) The ordering of a nonscheduled drug or device for services that fall outside the scope of services specified in subdivision (a) of Section 2746.5 in accordance with mutually agreed upon policies and protocols
 pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2746.5.

(3) The ordering of a Schedule IV or V drug for any condition, including, but not limited to, for care that falls within the scope of services specified in subdivision (a) of Section 2746.5.

(4) The ordering of a Schedule II or III drug in accordance with mutually agreed upon policies and protocols pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2746.5.

(5) Transmitting an order of a physician and surgeon.

(d) “Drug order” or “order” for purposes of this section means an order for medication or for a drug or device that is dispensed to or for an ultimate user, issued by a certified nurse-midwife
 as an individual practitioner, within the meaning of Section 1306.03 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, (1) a drug order issued pursuant to this section shall be treated in the same manner as a prescription of the supervising physician; (2) all references to “prescription” in this code and the Health and Safety Code shall include drug orders issued by certified nurse-midwives; and (3) the signature of a certified nurse-midwife on a drug order issued in accordance with this section shall be deemed to be the signature of a prescriber for purposes of this code and the Health and Safety Code.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, a certified nurse-midwife may directly procure supplies and devices, obtain and administer diagnostic tests, directly obtain and administer nonscheduled drugs, and
 dispense drugs pursuant to Section 4170, consistent with the provision of services that fall within the scope of services specified in subdivision (a) of Section 2746.5, order laboratory and diagnostic testing, and receive reports that are necessary to their practice as a certified nurse-midwife within their scope of practice, consistent with Section 2746.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 497, Sec. 3.   (SB 667)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2746.52.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 2746.5, the certificate to practice nurse-midwifery authorizes the holder to perform and repair episiotomies, and to repair first-degree and second-degree lacerations of the perineum.

(b) A certified nurse-midwife performing and repairing first-degree and second-degree lacerations of the perineum shall do both of the following:

(1) Ensure that all complications are referred to a physician and surgeon immediately.

(2) Ensure immediate care of patients who are in need of care beyond the scope
 of practice of the certified nurse-midwife, or emergency care for times when a physician and surgeon is not on the premises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 88, Sec. 6.   (SB 1237)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2746.53.

The board may charge the applicant a fee to cover all necessary costs to implement Section 2746.51, that shall be not more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) for an initial application, nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for an application for renewal. The board may charge a penalty fee for failure to renew a furnishing number within the prescribed time that shall be not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 413, Sec. 9.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2746.54.

(a) A certified nurse-midwife shall disclose in oral and written form to a prospective patient as part of a patient care plan, and obtain informed consent for, all of the following:

(1) The patient is retaining a certified nurse-midwife and the certified nurse-midwife is not supervised by a physician and surgeon.

(2) The certified nurse-midwife’s current licensure status and license number.

(3) The practice settings in which the certified nurse-midwife practices.

(4) If the
 certified nurse-midwife does not have liability coverage for the practice of midwifery, the certified nurse-midwife shall disclose that fact.

 (5) There are conditions that are outside of the scope of practice of a certified nurse-midwife that will result in a referral for a consultation from, or transfer of care to, a physician and surgeon.

(6) The specific arrangements for the referral of complications to a physician and surgeon for consultation. The certified nurse-midwife shall not be required to identify a specific physician and surgeon.

(7) The specific arrangements for the transfer of care during the prenatal period, hospital transfer during the intrapartum and postpartum periods, and access to appropriate emergency
 medical services for mother and baby if necessary, and recommendations for preregistration at a hospital that has obstetric emergency services and is most likely to receive the transfer.

(8) If, during the course of care, the patient is informed that the patient has or may have a condition indicating the need for a mandatory transfer, the certified nurse-midwife shall initiate the transfer.

(9) The availability of the text of laws regulating certified nurse-midwifery practices and the procedure for reporting complaints to the Board of Registered Nursing, which may be found on the Board of Registered Nursing’s internet website.
